South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4350.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Beaufort County voting precincts SECTION 1.    Section 7-7-110 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-7-110.    (A) In Beaufort County there are the following voting precincts: Beaufort 1 Beaufort 2 Beaufort 3 Belfair 1 Belfair 2 Bluffton 1A Bluffton 1B Bluffton 1C Bluffton 1D Bluffton 2A Bluffton 2B Bluffton 2C Bluffton 2D Bluffton 2E Bluffton 2F Bluffton 3 Bluffton 4A Bluffton 4B Bluffton 4C Bluffton 4D Bluffton 4E Bluffton 4F Bluffton 5A Bluffton 5B Bluffton 5C Bluffton 5D Bluffton 5E Bluffton 6A Bluffton 6B Bluffton 7A Bluffton 7B Buckwalter 1 Buckwalter 2 Burton 1A Burton 1B Burton 1C Burton 1D Burton 2A Burton 2B Burton 2C Burton 2D Burton 3A Burton 3B Burton 4 Burton 5A Burton 5B Chechessee 1 Chechessee 2 Chechessee 3 Dale Lobeco Daufuskie Hilton Head 1A Hilton Head 1B Hilton Head 2A Hilton Head 2B Hilton Head 2C Hilton Head 2D Hilton Head 2E Hilton Head 3 Hilton Head 4A Hilton Head 4B Hilton Head 4C Hilton Head 4D Hilton Head 5A Hilton Head 5B Hilton Head 5C Hilton Head 6 Hilton Head 7A Hilton Head 7B Hilton Head 7C Hilton Head 8 Hilton Head 9A Hilton Head 9B Hilton Head 9C Hilton Head 9D Hilton Head 10 Hilton Head 11 Hilton Head 12 Hilton Head 13 Hilton Head 14 Hilton Head 15A Hilton Head 15B Ladys Island 1A Ladys Island 1B Ladys Island 2A Ladys Island 2B Ladys Island 2C Ladys Island 2D Ladys Island 3A Ladys Island 3B Ladys Island 3C Ladys Island 4A Ladys Island 4B Ladys Island 4C Moss Creek 1 Moss Creek 2 Mossy Oaks 1A Mossy Oaks 1B Mossy Oaks 2 New River 1 New River 2 New River 3 Palmetto Bluff Port Royal 1 Port Royal 2 Pritchardville 1 Riverbend 1 Riverbend 2 Rose Hill 1 Rose Hill 2 Sandy Pointe Seabrook 1 Seabrook 2 Seabrook 3 Sheldon 1 Sheldon 2 Spanish Wells St. Helena 1A St. Helena 1B St. Helena 1C St. Helena 1D St. Helena 2A St. Helena 2B St. Helena 2C Sun City 1 Sun City 2 Sun City 3 Sun City 4 Sun City 5 Sun City 6 Sun City 7 Sun City 8 Sun City 9 Sun City 10 (B) The precinct lines defining the above precincts are as shown on the official map prepared by and on file with the Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office designated as document P-13-25 and as shown on copies provided to the Board of Voter Registration and Elections of Beaufort County by the Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office. (C) The polling places for the precincts provided in this section must be established by the Board of Voter Registration and Elections of Beaufort County subject to the approval of a majority of the Beaufort County Delegation. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 8th day of May, 2025. Approved the 12th day of May, 2025. __________